District of Columbia statutes.
2-604

Enrollment of Council acts and resolutions; filing with Archives.

After enactment by the Council, but before any presentation to the Mayor, each act and resolution of the Council shall be set forth on parchment or other such suitable paper.

Oct. 8, 1975, D.C. Law 1-19, title II, § 206, 22 DCR 2062
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-235, § 3, 38 DCR 302
Public records management, see § 2-1701 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 1-1604.
1973 Ed., § 1-1604.